Massachusetts, session 194th, H5286.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 51B of chapter 119 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after subsection (b) the following subsection:-
(b½) If the parent, guardian or other caretaker provides evidence that the child has a
preexisting diagnosis of rickets, Ehlers-Danlos syndrome, osteogenesis imperfecta, vitamin D
deficiency or any other medical condition known to appear or be caused by, or known to be
misdiagnosed as, abuse, the department shall consult with a physician or advanced practice
registered nurse who routinely provides medical care to pediatric patients. If the physician or
registered nurse deems it appropriate, they may conduct an examination of the child to advise on
whether the symptoms of suspected abuse or neglect are likely to have been caused by a medical
condition. No consultation or examination shall be requested or performed pursuant to this
subsection for the purpose of obtaining a second opinion as to whether a child has been sexually
abused.
of 1